Maryland, session 2025, SB0067.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health Occupations
1–707.
(A) EACH HEALTH OCCUPATIONS BOARD MAY ESTABLISH A PROCESS TO
INCLUDE A NOTATION INDICATING VETERAN STATUS ON A LICENSE, CERTIFICATE,
OR REGISTRATION, OR PUBLIC PROFILE AND TO ASSIST IN DETERMINING
ELIGIBILITY FOR STATE AND FEDERAL VETERANS BENEFITS IN ACCORDANCE WITH
THIS SECTION.
(B) IF A HEALTH OCCUPATIONS BOARD ESTABLISHES THE PROCESS
DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION, AN APPLICATION FOR A LICENSE,
CERTIFICATE, OR REGISTRATION, OR PUBLIC PROFILE SHALL ALLOW AN APPLICANT
TO:
(1) PRESENT A CERTIFICATION OF VETERAN STATUS OBTAINED
FROM THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AND MILITARY FAMILIES IN ACCORDANCE
WITH § 9–905 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, A DD FORM 214, OR OTHER
DOCUMENTATION ACCEPTABLE TO THE HEALTH OCCUPATIONS BOARD CERTIFYING
VETERAN STATUS; AND
(2) INDICATE THAT THE APPLICANT CONSENTS TO:
– 1 –

Ch. 248 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(I) HAVING A NOTATION ON THE APPLICANT’S LICENSE,
CERTIFICATE, OR REGISTRATION, OR PUBLIC PROFILE INDICATING THAT THE
APPLICANT IS A VETERAN; AND
(II) BEING CONTACTED BY APPROPRIATE EXECUTIVE BRANCH
AGENCIES REGARDING THE APPLICANT’S ELIGIBILITY FOR STATE OR FEDERAL
VETERANS BENEFITS.
(C) IF AN APPLICANT PRESENTS THE REQUIRED DOCUMENTATION AND
CONSENTS IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, A HEALTH
OCCUPATIONS BOARD SHALL:
(1) INCLUDE ON THE APPLICANT’S LICENSE, CERTIFICATION, OR
REGISTRATION, OR PUBLIC PROFILE A NOTATION INDICATING THAT THE APPLICANT
IS A VETERAN; AND
(2) IN ACCORDANCE WITH §§ 4–304 THROUGH 4–325 OF THE
GENERAL PROVISIONS ARTICLE AND ANY OTHER APPLICABLE LAW, AND ON
REQUEST FROM AN EXECUTIVE BRANCH AGENCY, ELECTRONICALLY TRANSMIT TO
THE EXECUTIVE BRANCH AGENCY APPROPRIATE INFORMATION ABOUT THE
APPLICANT RELEVANT TO DETERMINING THE APPLICANT’S ELIGIBILITY FOR STATE
OR FEDERAL VETERANS BENEFITS.
(D) EACH HEALTH OCCUPATIONS BOARD MAY ADOPT REGULATIONS TO
CARRY OUT THE PROVISIONS OF THIS SECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 6, 2025.
– 2 –